test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_zhagay_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     zhagay: zhagay
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1zhagay: nizhagay
     +Px2zhagay: gizhagay
     +Px3zhagay: ozhagay
     +PxIndefzhagay: izhagay
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     zhagay+Con: zhagayenh
     zhagay+Dim: zhagayens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     zhagay+Pos: zhagayim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     zhagay+Pej: zhagayish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     zhagay+Pos1Pl: zhagayinaan
     zhagay+PosObv: zhagayini
     zhagay+PosPl: zhagayiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     zhagay+Pret: zhagayiban
     zhagay+VocPl: zhagay***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     zhagay+Loc: zhagaying
     zhagay+Obv: zhagayan
     zhagay+Pl: zhagayag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1zhagay+Con: nizhagayenh
     +Px1zhagay+Dim: nizhagayens
     +Px2zhagay+Con: gizhagayenh
     +Px2zhagay+Dim: gizhagayens
     +Px3zhagay+Con: ozhagayenh
     +Px3zhagay+Dim: ozhagayens
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con: izhagayenh
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim: izhagayens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1zhagay+Pos: nizhagayim
     +Px2zhagay+Pos: gizhagayim
     +Px3zhagay+Pos: ozhagayim
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos: izhagayim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1zhagay+Pej: nizhagayish
     +Px2zhagay+Pej: gizhagayish
     +Px3zhagay+Pej: ozhagayish
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej: izhagayish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1zhagay+Pos1Pl: nizhagayinaan
     +Px1zhagay+PosObv: nizhagayini
     +Px1zhagay+PosPl: nizhagayiwaa
     +Px2zhagay+Pos1Pl: gizhagayinaan
     +Px2zhagay+PosObv: gizhagayini
     +Px2zhagay+PosPl: gizhagayiwaa
     +Px3zhagay+Pos1Pl: ozhagayinaan
     +Px3zhagay+PosObv: ozhagayini
     +Px3zhagay+PosPl: ozhagayiwaa
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos1Pl: izhagayinaan
     +PxIndefzhagay+PosObv: izhagayini
     +PxIndefzhagay+PosPl: izhagayiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1zhagay+Pret: nizhagayiban
     +Px1zhagay+VocPl: nizhagay***idig, idog***
     +Px2zhagay+Pret: gizhagayiban
     +Px2zhagay+VocPl: gizhagay***idig, idog***
     +Px3zhagay+Pret: ozhagayiban
     +Px3zhagay+VocPl: ozhagay***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pret: izhagayiban
     +PxIndefzhagay+VocPl: izhagay***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1zhagay+Loc: nizhagaying
     +Px1zhagay+Obv: nizhagayan
     +Px1zhagay+Pl: nizhagayag
     +Px2zhagay+Loc: gizhagaying
     +Px2zhagay+Obv: gizhagayan
     +Px2zhagay+Pl: gizhagayag
     +Px3zhagay+Loc: ozhagaying
     +Px3zhagay+Obv: ozhagayan
     +Px3zhagay+Pl: ozhagayag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Loc: izhagaying
     +PxIndefzhagay+Obv: izhagayan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pl: izhagayag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     zhagay+Con+Pos: zhagayenhim
     zhagay+Dim+Pos: zhagayensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     zhagay+Con+Pej: zhagayenhish
     zhagay+Dim+Pej: zhagayensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl: zhagayenhinaan
     zhagay+Con+PosObv: zhagayenhini
     zhagay+Con+PosPl: zhagayenhiwaa
     zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl: zhagayensinaan
     zhagay+Dim+PosObv: zhagayensini
     zhagay+Dim+PosPl: zhagayensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     zhagay+Con+Pret: zhagayenhiban
     zhagay+Con+VocPl: zhagayenh***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Dim+Pret: zhagayensiban
     zhagay+Dim+VocPl: zhagayens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     zhagay+Con+Loc: zhagayenhing
     zhagay+Con+Obv: zhagayenhan
     zhagay+Con+Pl: zhagayenhag
     zhagay+Dim+Loc: zhagayensing
     zhagay+Dim+Obv: zhagayensan
     zhagay+Dim+Pl: zhagayensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     zhagay+Pos+Pej: zhagayimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl: zhagayiminaan
     zhagay+Pos+PosObv: zhagayimini
     zhagay+Pos+PosPl: zhagayimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     zhagay+Pos+Pret: zhagayimiban
     zhagay+Pos+VocPl: zhagayim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     zhagay+Pos+Loc: zhagayiming
     zhagay+Pos+Obv: zhagayiman
     zhagay+Pos+Pl: zhagayimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl: zhagayishinaan
     zhagay+Pej+PosObv: zhagayishini
     zhagay+Pej+PosPl: zhagayishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     zhagay+Pej+Pret: zhagayishiban
     zhagay+Pej+VocPl: zhagayish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     zhagay+Pej+Loc: zhagayishing
     zhagay+Pej+Obv: zhagayishan
     zhagay+Pej+Pl: zhagayishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     zhagay+Pos1Pl+Pret: zhagayinaaniban
     zhagay+Pos1Pl+VocPl: zhagayinaan***idig, idog***
     zhagay+PosObv+Pret: zhagayiniiban
     zhagay+PosObv+VocPl: zhagayini***idig, idog***
     zhagay+PosPl+Pret: zhagayiwaaiban
     zhagay+PosPl+VocPl: zhagayiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     zhagay+Pos1Pl+Loc: zhagayinaaning
     zhagay+Pos1Pl+Obv: zhagayinaanan
     zhagay+Pos1Pl+Pl: zhagayinaanag
     zhagay+PosObv+Loc: zhagayiniing
     zhagay+PosObv+Obv: zhagayinian
     zhagay+PosObv+Pl: zhagayiniag
     zhagay+PosPl+Loc: zhagayiwaaing
     zhagay+PosPl+Obv: zhagayiwaaan
     zhagay+PosPl+Pl: zhagayiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     zhagay+Pret+Loc: zhagayibaning
     zhagay+Pret+Obv: zhagayibanan
     zhagay+Pret+Pl: zhagayibanag
     zhagay+VocPl+Loc: zhagay***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+VocPl+Obv: zhagay***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+VocPl+Pl: zhagay***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos: nizhagayenhim
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos: nizhagayensim
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos: gizhagayenhim
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos: gizhagayensim
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos: ozhagayenhim
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos: ozhagayensim
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos: izhagayenhim
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos: izhagayensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pej: nizhagayenhish
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pej: nizhagayensish
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pej: gizhagayenhish
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pej: gizhagayensish
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pej: ozhagayenhish
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pej: ozhagayensish
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pej: izhagayenhish
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pej: izhagayensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl: nizhagayenhinaan
     +Px1zhagay+Con+PosObv: nizhagayenhini
     +Px1zhagay+Con+PosPl: nizhagayenhiwaa
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl: nizhagayensinaan
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+PosObv: nizhagayensini
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+PosPl: nizhagayensiwaa
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl: gizhagayenhinaan
     +Px2zhagay+Con+PosObv: gizhagayenhini
     +Px2zhagay+Con+PosPl: gizhagayenhiwaa
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl: gizhagayensinaan
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+PosObv: gizhagayensini
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+PosPl: gizhagayensiwaa
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl: ozhagayenhinaan
     +Px3zhagay+Con+PosObv: ozhagayenhini
     +Px3zhagay+Con+PosPl: ozhagayenhiwaa
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl: ozhagayensinaan
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+PosObv: ozhagayensini
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+PosPl: ozhagayensiwaa
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos1Pl: izhagayenhinaan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+PosObv: izhagayenhini
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+PosPl: izhagayenhiwaa
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl: izhagayensinaan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+PosObv: izhagayensini
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+PosPl: izhagayensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pret: nizhagayenhiban
     +Px1zhagay+Con+VocPl: nizhagayenh***idig, idog***
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pret: nizhagayensiban
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+VocPl: nizhagayens***idig, idog***
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pret: gizhagayenhiban
     +Px2zhagay+Con+VocPl: gizhagayenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pret: gizhagayensiban
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+VocPl: gizhagayens***idig, idog***
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pret: ozhagayenhiban
     +Px3zhagay+Con+VocPl: ozhagayenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pret: ozhagayensiban
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+VocPl: ozhagayens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pret: izhagayenhiban
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+VocPl: izhagayenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pret: izhagayensiban
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+VocPl: izhagayens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Loc: nizhagayenhing
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Obv: nizhagayenhan
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pl: nizhagayenhag
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Loc: nizhagayensing
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Obv: nizhagayensan
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pl: nizhagayensag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Loc: gizhagayenhing
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Obv: gizhagayenhan
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pl: gizhagayenhag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Loc: gizhagayensing
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Obv: gizhagayensan
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pl: gizhagayensag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Loc: ozhagayenhing
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Obv: ozhagayenhan
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pl: ozhagayenhag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Loc: ozhagayensing
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Obv: ozhagayensan
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pl: ozhagayensag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Loc: izhagayenhing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Obv: izhagayenhan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pl: izhagayenhag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Loc: izhagayensing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Obv: izhagayensan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pl: izhagayensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+Pej: nizhagayimish
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pej: gizhagayimish
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pej: ozhagayimish
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pej: izhagayimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl: nizhagayiminaan
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosObv: nizhagayimini
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosPl: nizhagayimiwaa
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl: gizhagayiminaan
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosObv: gizhagayimini
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosPl: gizhagayimiwaa
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl: ozhagayiminaan
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosObv: ozhagayimini
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosPl: ozhagayimiwaa
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl: izhagayiminaan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosObv: izhagayimini
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosPl: izhagayimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+Pret: nizhagayimiban
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+VocPl: nizhagayim***idig, idog***
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pret: gizhagayimiban
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+VocPl: gizhagayim***idig, idog***
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pret: ozhagayimiban
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+VocPl: ozhagayim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pret: izhagayimiban
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+VocPl: izhagayim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+Loc: nizhagayiming
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+Obv: nizhagayiman
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+Pl: nizhagayimag
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Loc: gizhagayiming
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Obv: gizhagayiman
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pl: gizhagayimag
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Loc: ozhagayiming
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Obv: ozhagayiman
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pl: ozhagayimag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Loc: izhagayiming
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Obv: izhagayiman
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pl: izhagayimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl: nizhagayishinaan
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosObv: nizhagayishini
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosPl: nizhagayishiwaa
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl: gizhagayishinaan
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosObv: gizhagayishini
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosPl: gizhagayishiwaa
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl: ozhagayishinaan
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosObv: ozhagayishini
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosPl: ozhagayishiwaa
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl: izhagayishinaan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosObv: izhagayishini
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosPl: izhagayishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pret: nizhagayishiban
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+VocPl: nizhagayish***idig, idog***
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pret: gizhagayishiban
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+VocPl: gizhagayish***idig, idog***
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pret: ozhagayishiban
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+VocPl: ozhagayish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pret: izhagayishiban
